Hawaii statutes.
[§481G-3] Distribution of products;
dealership required. No distributor shall sell, consign, exchange, or
otherwise transfer any product to any dealer for sale or resale in this State
except by way of a dealership. [L 1983, c 285, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next